Hawaii statutes.
[§113-1] Application. This chapter
shall be applicable to the acquisition of real property under the laws of the
State for use in any project or program in which federal or federal-aid funds
are used. [L 1971, c 32, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next